Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF2954.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [10.598] MINNESOTA AVIATION DAY. new text end new text begin August 19 of each year is designated as Minnesota Aviation Day. From the trailblazers who dared to fly to the dedicated mechanics, controllers, entrepreneurs, and industry leaders, aviation is built by the hands, hearts, and minds of those who dream big and work hard. August 19th is our state's opportunity to honor the people who have shaped Minnesota's aviation history and future. Each year, the governor must issue a proclamation honoring the observance. new text end